Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-22] Accepting guardianship or
conservatorship transferred from another state. (a) To confirm transfer
of a guardianship or conservatorship transferred to the State of Hawaii under
provisions similar to section 551G-21, the guardian or conservator shall
petition the court of the State of Hawaii to accept the guardianship or
conservatorship. The petition shall include a certified copy of the other
state's provisional order of transfer.

(b) Notice of a petition under subsection (a)
shall be given to those persons that would be entitled to notice if the
petition were a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a
protective order in the transferring state and the State of Hawaii. The notice
shall be given in the same manner as notice is required to be given in the
State of Hawaii.

(c) On the court's own motion or on request of
the guardian or conservator, the incapacitated or protected person, or other
person required to be notified of the proceeding, the court shall hold a
hearing on a petition filed pursuant to subsection (a).

(d) The court shall issue an order
provisionally granting a petition filed under subsection (a) unless:

(1) An objection is made and the objector establishes
that transfer of the proceeding would be contrary to the interests of the
incapacitated or protected person; or

(2) The guardian or conservator is ineligible for
appointment in the State of Hawaii.

(e) The court shall issue a final order
accepting the proceeding and appointing the guardian or conservator as guardian
or conservator in the State of Hawaii upon its receipt of a final order, issued
under provisions similar to section 551G-21, from the court where the
proceeding is being transferred from.

(f) No later than ninety days after issuance
of a final order accepting transfer of a guardianship or conservatorship, the
court shall determine whether the guardianship or conservatorship needs to be
modified to conform to the law of the State of Hawaii.

(g) In granting a petition under this section,
the court shall recognize a guardianship or conservatorship order from the
other state, including the determination of the incapacitated or protected
person's incapacity and the appointment of the guardian or conservator.

(h) The denial by a court of the State of
Hawaii of a petition to accept a guardianship or conservatorship transferred
from another state does not affect the ability of the guardian or conservator
to seek appointment as guardian or conservator in the State of Hawaii under
chapter 551 if the court has jurisdiction to make an appointment other than by
reason of the provisional order of transfer. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next